Hawaii, session 2025, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has a capital gains tax rate of 7.25 per cent, which is lower than the tax rate many of the State's residents pay on their wages and salaries.  The legislature further finds that the low capital gains tax rate primarily benefits wealthy individuals, including nonresidents who invest in real estate in the State.  According to the department of taxation, taxing capital gains at the same rate as ordinary income could generate over $132,000,000 in its first year of implementation, with that amount rising to an estimated $187,000,000 within six years. The legislature additionally finds that revenue generated by taxing capital gains at the same rate as ordinary income could be used to strengthen basic government programs, including tax credits for working families, emergency preparedness, disaster prevention, public education, affordable housing, construction, mental health services, public preschool programming, childcare access, climate change adaptation and mitigation, and homeless services. The legislature further finds that because section 55(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which covers the maximum rate of tax on net capital gain of noncorporate taxpayers, is inoperative for the State, a simple repeal of the applicable provisions of the State's tax laws will impose the ordinary income tax rate to capital gains income. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen tax fairness for working families by taxing capital gains at the same rate as ordinary income. SECTION 2.  Section 235-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§235-51  Tax imposed on individuals; rates.  (a) There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of every: (1)  Taxpayer who files a joint return under section 235-93; and (2)  Surviving spouse, a tax determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $4,800              1.40% of taxable income Over $4,800 but              $67.00 plus 3.20% of not over $9,600              excess over $4,800 Over $9,600 but              $221.00 plus 5.50% of not over $19,200             excess over $9,600 Over $19,200 but             $749.00 plus 6.40% of not over $28,800             excess over $19,200 Over $28,800 but             $1,363.00 plus 6.80% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $2,016.00 plus 7.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $2,707.00 plus 7.60% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $4,531.00 plus 7.90% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $6,427.00 plus 8.25% of not over $300,000             excess over $96,000 Over $300,000 but             $23,257.00 plus 9.00% of not over $350,000             excess over $300,000 Over $350,000 but             $27,757.00 plus 10.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $350,000 Over $400,000                $32,757.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $400,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $19,200             1.40% of taxable income Over $19,200 but             $269.00 plus 3.20% of not over $28,800             excess over $19,200 Over $28,800 but             $576.00 plus 5.50% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $1,104.00 plus 6.40% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $1,718.00 plus 6.80% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $3,350.00 plus 7.20% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $5,078.00 plus 7.60% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $16,782.00 plus 7.90% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $24,682.00 plus 8.25% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $32,932.00 plus 9.00% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $41,932.00 plus 10.00% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000                $51,932.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $650,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $28,800             1.40% of taxable income Over $28,800 but             $403.00 plus 3.20% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $710.00 plus 5.50% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $1,238.00 plus 6.40% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $2,774.00 plus 6.80% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $4,406.00 plus 7.20% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $15,494.00 plus 7.60% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $23,094.00 plus 7.90% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $30,994.00 plus 8.25% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $39,244.00 plus 9.00% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000 but             $48,244.00 plus 10.00% of not over $800,000             excess over $650,000 Over $800,000                $63,244.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $800,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2028: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $38,400             1.40% of taxable income Over $38,400 but             $538.00 plus 3.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $845.00 plus 5.50% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $2,165.00 plus 6.40% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $3,701.00 plus 6.80% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $14,173.00 plus 7.20% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $21,373.00 plus 7.60% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $28,973.00 plus 7.90% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $36,873.00 plus 8.25% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000 but             $45,123.00 plus 9.00% of not over $800,000             excess over $650,000 Over $800,000 but             $58,623.00 plus 10.00% of not over $950,000             excess over $800,000 Over $950,000                $73,623.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $950,000. (b)  There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of every head of a household a tax determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $3,600              1.40% of taxable income Over $3,600 but              $50.00 plus 3.20% of not over $7,200              excess over $3,600 Over $7,200 but              $166.00 plus 5.50% of not over $14,400             excess over $7,200 Over $14,400 but             $562.00 plus 6.40% of not over $21,600             excess over $14,400 Over $21,600 but             $1,022.00 plus 6.80% of not over $28,800             excess over $21,600 Over $28,800 but             $1,512.00 plus 7.20% of not over $36,000             excess over $28,800 Over $36,000 but             $2,030.00 plus 7.60% of not over $54,000             excess over $36,000 Over $54,000 but             $3,398.00 plus 7.90% of not over $72,000             excess over $54,000 Over $72,000 but             $4,820.00 plus 8.25% of not over $225,000             excess over $72,000 Over $225,000 but             $17,443.00 plus 9.00% of not over $262,500             excess over $225,000 Over $262,500 but             $20,818.00 plus 10.00% of not over $300,000             excess over $262,500 Over $300,000                $24,568.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $300,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $14,400             1.40% of taxable income Over $14,400 but             $202.00 plus 3.20% of not over $21,600             excess over $14,400 Over $21,600 but             $432.00 plus 5.50% of not over $28,800             excess over $21,600 Over $28,800 but             $828.00 plus 6.40% of not over $36,000             excess over $28,800 Over $36,000 but             $1,289.00 plus 6.80% of not over $54,000             excess over $36,000 Over $54,000 but             $2,513.00 plus 7.20% of not over $72,000             excess over $54,000 Over $72,000 but             $3,809.00 plus 7.60% of not over $187,500             excess over $72,000 Over $187,500 but             $12,587.00 plus 7.90% of not over $262,500             excess over $187,500 Over $262,500 but             $18,512.00 plus 8.25% of not over $337,500             excess over $262,500 Over $337,500 but             $24,699.00 plus 9.00% of not over $412,500             excess over $337,500 Over $412,500 but             $31,449.00 plus 10.00% of not over $487,500             excess over $412,500 Over $487,500                $38,949.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $487,500. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $21,600             1.40% of taxable income Over $21,600 but             $302.00 plus 3.20% of not over $28,800             excess over $21,600 Over $28,800 but             $533.00 plus 5.50% of not over $36,000             excess over $28,800 Over $36,000 but             $929.00 plus 6.40% of not over $54,000             excess over $36,000 Over $54,000 but             $2,081.00 plus 6.80% of not over $72,000             excess over $54,000 Over $72,000 but             $3,305.00 plus 7.20% of not over $187,500             excess over $72,000 Over $187,500 but             $11,621.00 plus 7.60% of not over $262,500             excess over $187,500 Over $262,500 but             $17,321.00 plus 7.90% of not over $337,500             excess over $262,500 Over $337,500 but             $23,246.00 plus 8.25% of not over $412,500             excess over $337,500 Over $412,500 but             $29,433.00 plus 9.00% of not over $487,500             excess over $412,500 Over $487,500 but             $36,183.00 plus 10.00% of not over $600,000             excess over $487,500 Over $600,000                $47,433.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $600,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2028: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $28,800             1.40% of taxable income Over $28,800 but             $403.00 plus 3.20% of not over $36,000             excess over $28,800 Over $36,000 but             $634.00 plus 5.50% of not over $54,000             excess over $36,000 Over $54,000 but             $1,624.00 plus 6.40% of not over $72,000             excess over $54,000 Over $72,000 but             $2,776.00 plus 6.80% of not over $187,500             excess over $72,000 Over $187,500 but             $10,630.00 plus 7.20% of not over $262,500             excess over $187,500 Over $262,500 but             $16,030.00 plus 7.60% of not over $337,500             excess over $262,500 Over $337,500 but             $21,730.00 plus 7.90% of not over $412,500             excess over $337,500 Over $412,500 but             $27,655.00 plus 8.25% of not over $487,500             excess over $412,500 Over $487,500 but             $33,842.00 plus 9.00% of not over $600,000             excess over $487,500 Over $600,000 but             $43,967.00 plus 10.00% of not over $712,500             excess over $600,000 Over $712,500                $55,217.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $712,500. (c)  There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of (1) every unmarried individual (other than a surviving spouse, or the head of a household) and (2) on the taxable income of every married individual who does not make a single return jointly with the individual's spouse under section 235-93 a tax determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $2,400              1.40% of taxable income Over $2,400 but              $34.00 plus 3.20% of not over $4,800              excess over $2,400 Over $4,800 but              $110.00 plus 5.50% of not over $9,600              excess over $4,800 Over $9,600 but              $374.00 plus 6.40% of not over $14,400             excess over $9,600 Over $14,400 but             $682.00 plus 6.80% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $1,008.00 plus 7.20% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $1,354.00 plus 7.60% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $2,266.00 plus 7.90% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $3,214.00 plus 8.25% of not over $150,000             excess over $48,000 Over $150,000 but             $11,629.00 plus 9.00% of not over $175,000             excess over $150,000 Over $175,000 but             $13,879.00 plus 10.00% of not over $200,000             excess over $175,000 Over $200,000                $16,379.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $200,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $9,600              1.40% of taxable income Over $9,600 but              $134.00 plus 3.20% of not over $14,400             excess over $9,600 Over $14,400 but             $288.00 plus 5.50% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $552.00 plus 6.40% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $859.00 plus 6.80% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,675.00 plus 7.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $2,539.00 plus 7.60% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $8,391.00 plus 7.90% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $12,341.00 plus 8.25% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $16,466.00 plus 9.00% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $20,966.00 plus 10.00% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000                $25,966.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $325,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $14,400             1.40% of taxable income Over $14,400 but             $202.00 plus 3.20% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $355.00 plus 5.50% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $619.00 plus 6.40% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,387.00 plus 6.80% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $2,203.00 plus 7.20% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $7,747.00 plus 7.60% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $11,547.00 plus 7.90% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $15,497.00 plus 8.25% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $19,622.00 plus 9.00% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000 but             $24,122.00 plus 10.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $325,000 Over $400,000                $31,622.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $400,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2028: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $19,200             1.40% of taxable income Over $19,200 but             $269.00 plus 3.20% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $422.00 plus 5.50% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,082.00 plus 6.40% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $1,850.00 plus 6.80% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $7,086.00 plus 7.20% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $10,686.00 plus 7.60% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $14,486.00 plus 7.90% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $18,436.00 plus 8.25% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000 but             $22,561.00 plus 9.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $325,000 Over $400,000 but             $29,311.00 plus 10.00% of not over $475,000             excess over $400,000 Over $475,000                $36,811.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $475,000." (d)  The tax imposed by section 235-2.45 on estates and trusts shall be determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2001: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $2,000              1.40% of taxable income Over $2,000 but              $28.00 plus 3.20% of not over $4,000              excess over $2,000 Over $4,000 but              $92.00 plus 5.50% of not over $8,000              excess over $4,000 Over $8,000 but              $312.00 plus 6.40% of not over $12,000             excess over $8,000 Over $12,000 but             $568.00 plus 6.80% of not over $16,000             excess over $12,000 Over $16,000 but             $840.00 plus 7.20% of not over $20,000             excess over $16,000 Over $20,000 but             $1,128.00 plus 7.60% of not over $30,000             excess over $20,000 Over $30,000 but             $1,888.00 plus 7.90% of not over $40,000             excess over $30,000 Over $40,000                 $2,678.00 plus 8.25% of excess over $40,000. (e)  Any taxpayer, other than a corporation, acting as a business entity in more than one state who is required by this chapter to file a return may elect to report and pay a tax of .5 per cent of the taxpayer's annual gross sales if the: (1)  Taxpayer's only activities in this State consist of sales; (2)  Taxpayer does not own or rent real estate or tangible personal property; and (3)  Taxpayer's annual gross sales in or into this State during the tax year is not in excess of $100,000. [(f)  If a taxpayer has a net capital gain for any taxable year to which this subsection applies, then the tax imposed by this section shall not exceed the sum of: (1)  The tax computed at the rates and in the same manner as if this subsection had not been enacted on the greater of: (A)  The taxable income reduced by the amount of net capital gain, or (B)  The amount of taxable income taxed at a rate below 7.25 per cent, plus (2)  A tax of 7.25 per cent of the amount of taxable income in excess of the amount determined under paragraph (1). This subsection shall apply to individuals, estates, and trusts for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986.]" SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 4.  This Act, upon its approval, shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________